North Dakota, session 69, SB2010.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. APPROPRIATION. The funds provided in this section, or so much of the funds as may
be necessary, are appropriated out of any moneys in the general fund in the state treasury, not
otherwise appropriated, and from other funds derived from special funds and federal funds, to the
council on the arts for the purpose of defraying the expenses of the council on the arts, for the biennium
beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2027, as follows:
Adjustments or
Base Level Enhancements Appropriation
Salaries and wages $1,222,195 $412,927 $1,635,122
New and vacant FTE pool 0 16,519 16,519
Operating expenses 674,093 5,000 679,093
Grants 2,355,342 (18,541) 2,336,801
Total all funds $4,251,630 $415,905 $4,667,535
Less other funds 1,880,000 150,000 2,030,000
Total general fund $2,371,630 $265,905 $2,637,535
Full-time equivalent positions 6.00 0.00 6.00
SECTION 2. ONE-TIME FUNDING - EFFECT ON BASE BUDGET - REPORT TO THE
SEVENTIETH LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY. The following amounts reflect the one-time funding items
included in the appropriation in section 1 of this Act which are not included in the entity's base budget
for the 2027-29 biennium and which the entity shall report to the appropriations committees of the
seventieth legislative assembly regarding the use of this funding:
One-Time Funding Description General fund
Arts across the prairie education $5,000
Total $5,000
SECTION 3. APPROPRIATION - CULTURAL ENDOWMENT FUND. All income from the cultural
endowment fund is appropriated to the council on the arts for the furthering of the cultural arts in the
state, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2027. The council on the arts may
spend accrued interest in the fund, including on the portion of the fund designated for maintenance of
art projects constructed as part of the creative placemaking program, for the fabrication, site
preparation, and installation of creative placemaking program art projects. The accrued interest is not
subject to any spending limitations associated with maintenance of the art projects established by the
sixty-seventh legislative assembly.
SECTION 4. APPROPRIATION - GIFTS, GRANTS, AND BEQUESTS. All gifts, grants, devises,
bequests, donations, and assignments received by the council on the arts are appropriated to the
council on the arts for the purposes provided in section 54-54-06, for the biennium beginning July 1,
2025, and ending June 30, 2027.
SECTION 5. NEW AND VACANT FTE POOL - LIMITATION - TRANSFER REQUEST. The council
on the arts may not spend funds appropriated in the new and vacant FTE pool line item in section 1 of
this Act, but may request the office of management and budget to transfer funds from the new and
vacant FTE pool line item to the salaries and wages line item in accordance with the guidelines and

S. B. NO. 2010 - PAGE 2
reporting provisions included in House Bill No. 1015, as approved by the sixty-ninth legislative
assembly.
SECTION 6. STATE TROUBADOUR - POET LAUREATE. The grants line item in section 1 of this
Act includes $10,000 for the state troubadour and $10,000 for the poet laureate.
SECTION 7. EXEMPTION - LINE ITEM TRANSFERS - REPORT. Notwithstanding section
54-16-04, the director of the office of management and budget shall transfer funds between line items,
excluding the new and vacant FTE pool line item, in section 1 of this Act as requested by the council on
the arts. The council on the arts shall notify the legislative council of any transfer made pursuant to this
section. The council on the arts shall report to the budget section after June 30, 2026, any transfer
made in excess of $50,000 and to the appropriations committees of the seventieth legislative assembly
regarding any transfers made pursuant to this section.
SECTION 8. EXEMPTION - UNEXPENDED APPROPRIATION. The amount of $25,000
appropriated from the general fund for the purpose of accrued leave payouts in section 1 of chapter 10
of the 2023 Session Laws is not subject to section 54-44.1-11 and any unexpended funds may be
continued and are available to the council on the arts for costs relating to accrued leave payouts during
the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2027.

S. B. NO. 2010 - PAGE 3
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Speaker of the House
____________________________ ____________________________
Secretary of the Senate Chief Clerk of the House
This certifies that the within bill originated in the Senate of the Sixty-ninth Legislative Assembly of North
Dakota and is known on the records of that body as Senate Bill No. 2010.
Senate Vote: Yeas 34 Nays 13 Absent 0
House Vote: Yeas 61 Nays 30 Absent 3
____________________________
Secretary of the Senate
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State